PhonPract.twolc
Alphabet
a u i e o ɨ
p t k r ch w ɬ l ʃ s m n y h
p' t' k' r' ch' w' l' ts' m' n' y' ʔ '

%{NC%}


;
! Natural Classes relevant to alternations
Sets

V = a e i o u ɨ ; ! All vowels

P = p t k r ch w ɬ l ʃ s m n y h; ! Plain consonants

G = p' t' k' r' ch' w' l' l' ts' ts' m' n' y' '; ! Glottalized consonants

S = p t k ;

C = P G ;

Rules
"Incompletive glottalization"
Cx:Cy <=> _ V %{NC%}: ;  ! this last colon was necessary to make the deletion work. 
            where Cx in P
                Cy in G
            matched ;
! This rule says change P into G before a vowel and the NC tag on the lexical side. 
! The P:G correspondence is restricted to _ V {NC}
! The : makes sure this is {NC} in the lexical side (it can correspond to anything on the lower side). 
! Because of the deletion rule we have two correspondences {NC}:{NC} and {NC}:0. Both should cause glottalization. 
! If it is {NC} without the colon only the first would work. The second would be ignored for this rule
! In this case the whole form deletes. WHY? It seems to be because on the forms fails and so the whole form is deleted. 
! This results in xuka{NC:NC} and xuka{NC:0} (as well as xuk'a{NC:NC} and xuk'a{NC:0}) both of which fail. NC:NC is not permitted after P: V _. NC:0 is not permitted after P: V _
! So the P forms are no allowed (they fail) - I guess that means removed. 
! If these are removed there is nothing left to glottalize or delete - they failed. 
! It seems that you could use this your advantage. Delete forms that fail.

!This works but deglottalization will fail since l' and ts' are mapped to two different P consonants. 


 "Incompletive Tag removal"
 %{NC%}:0 <=> :G V _ # ;
 ! This rule says delete NC after a lower side G followed by a vowel and a word boundary. 
 ! The {NC}:0 correspondence is only possible after :G V _
 
!Consonant lenition rule
"CC Lenition"
Cx:h <=> _ S ;
    where Cx in (p t k ch ɬ l ʃ s ) ;

!First syllable nucleas geminates in the affective iv completive form. This rule is correct. Seem a bit verbose. 
"Lengthening"
Vx:Vy <=> # (C) _ C V %{AFF%}: ;
        where Vx in (a e i o u ɨ) 
        Vy in (aa ee ii oo uu ɨɨ)
        matched;

 "Affective Tag removal"
 %{AFF%}:0 <=> V _  ;


! Not sure how to get the consonants to deglottalize. I need to check the environment.
        
